California, session 20252026, AB1780.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14574.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:14574.5. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a distributor is exempt from making redemption payments to the department for filled beverage containers containing water or juice, as described in paragraphs (4), (7), and (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504, that the distributor donates to an any of the following:(A) An organization that is located in California and exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.(B) A school belonging to the public school system, as defined in Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.(C) A first responder, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8562 of the Government Code.(2) Donations, Sales, donations, samples, or giveaways, or any other transaction, of filled beverage containers by a distributor other than those enumerated in paragraph (1) are subject to the redemption payment and all other applicable payments under this division.(b) (1) A distributor shall prepare and maintain records of any donations of filled beverage containers that the distributor donates to an organization pursuant to subdivision (a). The records shall include all of the following:(A) A charitable donation receipt issued by the recipient organization.(B) The date of the donation.(C) The number, size, and material type of beverage containers donated.(D) The amount of redemption payments that would have been paid if not exempted.(E) The original bill of lading and similar third-party shipping document or receipt indicating the entity that received the shipment of beverage containers.(2) (A) The records shall be maintained for a period of not less than five years and shall be made available provided to the department upon request.(B) Failure to maintain or provide the records shall result in disqualification of the exemption in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(c) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section. Emergency regulations, if adopted, shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted under this section shall be filed with, but not repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until revised by the director.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.